Washington statutes.
RCW 43.05.120

Time for compliance—Extension.

The date for compliance established by the department of ecology, labor and industries, agriculture, fish and wildlife, health, licensing, or natural resources pursuant to RCW 43.05.060, 43.05.090, or 43.05.100 respectively shall provide for a reasonable time to achieve compliance. Any person receiving a notice of correction pursuant to RCW 43.05.060 or 43.05.100 or a report or citation pursuant to RCW 43.05.090 may request an extension of time to achieve compliance for good cause from the issuing department. Requests shall be submitted to the issuing department and responded to by the issuing department in writing in accordance with procedures specified by the issuing department in the notice, report, or citation.

[ 1995 c 403 s 613.]